Hawaii statutes.
§707-756 Electronic enticement of a child
in the first degree. (1) Any person who, using a computer or any other
electronic device:

(a) Intentionally or knowingly communicates:

(i) With a minor known by the person to be
under the age of eighteen years;

(ii) With another person, in reckless
disregard of the risk that the other person is under the age of eighteen years,
and the other person is under the age of eighteen years; or

(iii) With another person who represents that
person to be under the age of eighteen years;

(b) With the intent to promote or facilitate the
commission of a felony:

(i) That is a murder in the first or second
degree;

(ii) That is a class A felony; or

(iii) That is another covered offense as
defined in section 846E-1,

agrees to meet with the minor, or with another
person who represents that person to be a minor under the age of eighteen
years; and

(c) Intentionally or knowingly travels to the agreed
upon meeting place at the agreed upon meeting time,

is guilty of electronic enticement of a child in the
first degree.

(2) Electronic enticement of a child in the
first degree is a class B felony. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a
person convicted of electronic enticement of a child in the first degree shall
be sentenced to an indeterminate term of imprisonment as provided by law. [L
2002, c 200, pt of §1; am L 2006, c 80, §2; am L 2008, c 80, §3]

Case Notes

Requiring the use of a computer or other electronic device to
travel to the agreed-upon meeting place at the agreed-upon time would render
the statute absurd in meaning; and requiring the use of a computer or other
electronic device to agree to meet with the minor would render the statute
structurally incoherent as a whole. With respect to the computer-use
requirement, the State was required to prove that defendant used a computer or
electronic device only to communicate with "Chyla". 131 H. 379, 319
P.3d 298 (2013).

This section does not concern interstate commerce, and
therefore, scrutiny under the commerce clause was not appropriate. Assuming,
arguendo, that this section warranted commerce clause scrutiny, this section
does not violate the dormant commerce clause. 131 H. 312 (App.), 318 P.3d 602
(2013).

This section was not unconstitutionally overbroad and/or
vague as applied to defendant, and the circuit court did not err in denying
defendant's motion to dismiss the indictment on that basis where, among other
things, when the statute was read as a whole, it was clear that only criminal
conduct was proscribed and the statute plainly criminalized conduct that is
coupled with the intent to promote or facilitate the commission of a felony.
131 H. 312 (App.), 318 P.3d 602 (2013).

Trial court did not err in rejecting defendant's proffered
reason for requesting the withdrawal of defendant's second guilty plea on the
ground that defendant had not been aware of a potentially meritorious defense
that the State was unable to prove that defendant had traveled to the agreed
upon meeting place as required under subsection (1)(c), where transcripts of
the internet chat room conversations defendant had with minor provided
compelling evidence that the meeting place was the Burger King, not a
particular area within the Burger King. 120 H. 480 (App.), 210 P.3d 3 (2009).

Where it was not necessary for defendant to actually commit
one of the felony offenses defined in §846E-1 in order to violate the
prohibition against the electronic enticement of a child under subsection (1)
but only necessary under subsection (1)(b)(iii) that defendant act with the
intent to promote or facilitate the commission of a felony offense defined in
§846E-1, the State was not required to specify in the indictment which §846E-1
felony offense defendant intended to promote or facilitate. 120 H. 480 (App.),
210 P.3d 3 (2009).

Where State presented evidence to the grand jury that the
person communicating with defendant represented to defendant that the person
was a 14-year old girl, the State was not required to prove under subsection
(1)(a)(iii) that defendant engaged in communication with an actual child, and
the record showed that the agreed upon meeting place was the Burger King and
not a specific table within the Burger King, evidence before the grand jury
that defendant arrived at the Burger King and was arrested was sufficient to
establish probable cause regarding the meeting place element. 120 H. 480
(App.), 210 P.3d 3 (2009).

Circuit court did not abuse its discretion under HRE rule 403
in admitting video showing defendant masturbating for "child" where
video: (1) was extremely probative of defendant's intent to promote or
facilitate the commission of one of the predicate felonies necessary to prove
first degree electronic enticement of a child under this section; (2) provided
clear evidence of defendant's motives and desires regarding the "child"
and the extreme actions defendant was willing to undertake in order to entice
the "child"; and (3) was the strongest evidence of defendant's
intention to engage in sexual activity with the "child". 128 H. 328
(App.), 289 P.3d 964 (2012).

This section does not require proof that a defendant used a
computer or other electronic device to travel to the agreed upon meeting place
and the legislature did not intend the statute to require that the agreement to
meet be accomplished through the use of a computer or other electronic device;
requiring proof that the defendant used a computer to travel to the agreed upon
meeting place at the agreed upon meeting time would lead to absurd results; thus,
the circuit court did not erroneously instruct the jury on the elements for the
charged offense of first degree electronic enticement of a child. 128 H. 328
(App.), 289 P.3d 964 (2012).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next